Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7250.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35-3-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-3 entitled "State Budget"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-3-2. Annual appropriations for state government.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary to
pay the administrative and other expenses of the state government. The general assembly shall
adopt a spending cap on general budget expenditures equal to the greater of:
(1) The average five (5) year increase in personal income; or
(2) The annual increase in inflation per the consumer price index.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003598
========